src/fst/morphology/stems/adpositions.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@uit.no or feedback@divvun.no
!
! NB: through June 2019, J. Wilbur's development work made possible by Deutsche Forschungsgemeinschaft (grant 286335341)

!! # Adpositions

LEXICON Adposition ! main class
!Preposition ; !only prepositions -- check to see if this is a valid category!
Postposition ;
PrePostposition ;


!only postpositions
LEXICON Postposition   !!= * **@CODE@** is the list
allelin PostP "i väster" ;
badjen PostP "up" ;
badjen+Use/NG:bajjen PostP "up" ;
bajjelij PostP ;
bajjelin PostP ;
bajjelis PostP ;
bajelt PostP ;
baktu PostP ;
bálldal PostP ;
bálldala PostP ;
bálldaj PostP ;
birraj PostP ;
buohta PostP ;
dehti+Use/NG:dihta PostP ;
dehti PostP ;
duogen PostP "behind" ;
duohkáj PostP "to behind" ;
gaskav PostP ;
gaskan PostP ;
gaskanit PostP ;
gaskas PostP ;
gaskajnisa PostP ;
gasskaj PostP ;
gassko PostP ;
gitta+Use/NG:git PostP ;
gitta PostP ;
gugu PostP ;
guoran PostP ;
guorraj PostP ;
lahka PostP ;
lagamusan PostP ;
lunne PostP ;
lunne+Use/NG:lunn PostP ;
lunne+Use/NG:ludne PostP ;
luhte PostP ;
luse PostP "to";
luse+Use/NG:lusa PostP "to" ; !perhaps lussa?
maŋen PostP "along with; anbei";
maŋŋáj PostP ;
maŋŋelin PostP ;
maŋŋel PostP ;
maŋŋela PostP ;
maŋŋelatj PostP ;
maŋŋelatja PostP ;
maŋŋelij PostP ;
maŋŋelis PostP ;
maŋŋelt PostP ;
mihte PostP ;
mihte+Use/NG:milte PostP ;
mäddel PostP "förbi" ;
nala PostP ;
nala+Use/NG:nalá PostP ;
nala+Use/NG:nile PostP ;
nali PostP ;
nalta PostP ;
nanne PostP ;
nanne+Use/NG:nan PostP ;
nanne+Use/NG:naldne PostP ;
nanne+Use/NG:nanna PostP ;
njäjjga PostP ;
nuarrtal PostP ;
nuarrtala PostP ;
nuarrtalij PostP ;
nuarrtalin PostP ;
rájen PostP ;
rájest PostP ;
sinne PostP ;
sinne+Use/NG:sin PostP ;
sisste PostP "out of" ;
sisa PostP ;
sisa+Use/NG:sisá PostP ;
sisa+Use/NG:sis PostP ;
sissŋela PostP ;
sissŋelij PostP ;
tjara PostP ;
tjara+Use/NG:tjada PostP ;
vuolelt PostP ;
vuolen PostP ;
vuolest PostP ;
vuolev PostP ;
vuolláj PostP ;
vuässte PostP "against" ;
vuässte+Use/NG:vuosste PostP "against" ;
åvdålt PostP "towards" ;
åvdån PostP ;
åvvdåj PostP ;
åvdåst PostP ;
åvvdålist PostP "from in front" ;
åvvdålin PostP "in the front" ;
åvvdålij PostP "towards the front" ;


!only prepositions -- check to see if this is a valid category!
!LEXICON Preposition   !!= * __@CODE@__ is the list


!both pre- and postpositions
LEXICON PrePostposition   !!= * **@CODE@** is the list
rasstá PrePost "across" ;
birra PrePost "about" ;
badjel PrePost ;
badjel+Use/NG:bajjel PrePost ;



! PoS tags added below:

!only postpositions
LEXICON PostP   !!= * **@CODE@**  adds the tag +Po
+Po: ENDLEX ;

!only prepositions -- check to see if this is a valid category!
!LEXICON PreP   !!= * __@CODE@__  adds the tag +Pr
!+Pr: ENDLEX ;

!both pre- and postpositions
LEXICON PrePost   !!= * **@CODE@**  adds the tags +Po and +Pr
+Po: ENDLEX ;
+Pr: ENDLEX ;
